Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 9. Trusts to Promote Arts and Sciences

§ 39-9-1.
Creation of trusts; purposes.

Any person desiring in his lifetime, to promote the public welfare by founding, endowing and having maintained a public library, museum, art gallery or educational institutions within this state, to be operated without profit, may to that end and for such purposes by grant, in writing, convey to a trustee, or any number of trustees, named in such grant, and to their successors, forever, such real property in this state as shall be necessary to the operation of such library, museum, art gallery or educational institutions, and any personal property wherever situate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3636; 1942, § 6193; Laws, 1922, ch. 193.

§ 39-9-3.
Designations by grantor of trust.

The person making such grant may therein designate:

The nature, objects and purposes of the institution to be founded, endowed and maintained;

The name by which it shall be known;

The powers and duties of the trustee or trustees and the manner in which he or they shall account, and to whom, if accounting be required; however, such powers and duties shall not be held to be exclusive of other powers which may be necessary to enable such trustee or trustees to carry out the object of such grant;

The mode and manner, and by whom, the successors to the trustee or trustees named in the grant are to be appointed, in perpetuity; and

Such rules and regulations for the management of the property conveyed as the grantor may elect to prescribe; however, such rules shall be deemed advisory only, and shall not preclude such trustee or trustees from making such change as new conditions may from time to time require.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3637; 1942, § 6194; Laws, 1922, ch. 193.

§ 39-9-5.
Founding of institution for profit prohibited; payment of dividends; compensation of trustees; charging of fees by institutions.

No institution for pecuniary profit shall be founded under this chapter; nor shall any dividends be declared or paid by any institution founded under this chapter; and no trustee, officer, member or employee of any institution founded hereunder shall receive, or be entitled to receive, any pecuniary profit from the operations thereof except reasonable compensation for services in effecting or furthering any one or more of the objects or purposes of the institution. In case of a public library any requirements for the payment of fees for various privileges shall not divest such library of its public character when such requirements are usual or customary in case of public libraries throughout the state or the United States. In the case of educational institutions, requirements as to the payment of matriculation fees, laboratory fees, library fees, fees of like kind or nature, board and lodging of students, and any of the requirements customary or usually insisted upon in the public educational institutions of this state shall not divest such institutions of their public character.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3638; 1942, § 6195; Laws, 1922, ch. 193.

§ 39-9-7.
Exemption from taxation of institutions.

Every institution founded under this chapter, and the property of such institution, including real property, money, stock, bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, other evidences of indebtedness, and all other personal property, excepting motor vehicles, so far as devoted exclusively to carrying out objects and purposes of such institution shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxes. However, such institution shall own only such real property as shall be necessary to the fulfillment of the objects and purposes of such institution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3639; 1942, § 6196; Laws, 1922, ch. 193; Laws, 1978, ch. 514, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 39-9-9.
Receipt of gifts and bequests by institutions.

Every institution founded under this chapter shall be competent to receive by purchase or gift further property, provided the aggregate of all real property held by such institution shall not exceed the amount necessary to the fulfillment of the objects and purposes of such institution. Such institution shall be competent to receive by bequest further property provided such bequest is not in violation of sections two hundred and sixty-nine, and two hundred and seventy of the constitution of Mississippi. The property so received shall be devoted exclusively to the purposes of such institution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3640; 1942, § 6197; Laws, 1922, ch. 193.

§ 39-9-11.
Powers and duties of trustees.

The trustee or trustees named in any grant made and their successors, may in the name of the institution, as designated in such grant, sue and defend, in relation to the trust property and in relation to all matters affecting the institution endowed and established by such grant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3641; 1942, § 6198; Laws, 1922, ch. 193.

§ 39-9-13.
Execution, acknowledgement and recording of grants.

Any grant made under the provisions of this chapter may be executed, acknowledged and recorded in the same manner as is now provided by law for the execution, acknowledging, and recording of grants of real property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3642; 1942, § 6199; Laws, 1922, ch. 193.